Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-116
Bonds; officers appointed to fill vacancies; requirements.

Any person appointed to fill a vacancy, before entering upon the duties of the office, must give a bond corresponding in substance and form with the bond required of the officer originally elected or appointed, as herein provided.

Laws 1881, c. 13, § 16, p. 97;

R.S.1913, § 5722;

C.S.1922, § 5052;

C.S.1929, § 12-116;

R.S.1943, § 11-116.